Nevada, session 83, AB436.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 202.2548 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
202.2548 The provisions of NRS 202.2547 do not apply to:
1. The sale or transfer of a firearm by or to any law
enforcement agency and [, to the extent he or she is acting within
the course and scope of his or her employment and official duties,]
any peace officer, qualified retired law enforcement officer,
security guard entitled to carry a firearm under NAC 648.345,
member of the armed forces or federal official.
2. The sale or transfer of an antique firearm.
-
*AB436*

– 3 –
3. The sale or transfer of a firearm between immediate family
members, which for the purposes of this section means spouses and
domestic partners and any of the following relations, whether by
whole or half blood, adoption, or step-relation: parents, children,
siblings, grandparents, grandchildren, aunts, uncles, nieces and
nephews.
4. The transfer of a firearm to an executor, administrator,
trustee or personal representative of an estate or a trust that occurs
by operation of law upon the death of the former owner of the
firearm.
5. A temporary transfer of a firearm to a person who is not
prohibited from buying or possessing firearms under state or federal
law if such transfer:
(a) Is necessary to prevent imminent death or great bodily harm;
and
(b) Lasts only as long as immediately necessary to prevent such
imminent death or great bodily harm.
6. A temporary transfer of a firearm if:
(a) The transferor has no reason to believe that the transferee is
prohibited from buying or possessing firearms under state or federal
law;
(b) The transferor has no reason to believe that the transferee
will use or intends to use the firearm in the commission of a crime;
and
(c) Such transfer occurs and the transferee’s possession of the
firearm following the transfer is exclusively:
(1) At an established shooting range authorized by the
governing body of the jurisdiction in which such range is located;
(2) At a lawful organized competition involving the use of a
firearm;
(3) While participating in or practicing for a performance by
an organized group that uses firearms as a part of the public
performance;
(4) While hunting or trapping if the hunting or trapping is
legal in all places where the transferee possesses the firearm and the
transferee holds all licenses or permits required for such hunting or
trapping; or
(5) While in the presence of the transferor.
7. As used in this section, “qualified retired law enforcement
officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in 18 U.S.C. § 926C.
Sec. 2. NRS 202.3657 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.3657 1. Any person who is a resident of this State may
apply to the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides for a
permit on a uniform statewide form prescribed by regulation of the
Department. Any person who is not a resident of this State may
-
*AB436*

– 4 –
apply to the sheriff of any county in this State for a permit on a
uniform statewide form prescribed by regulation of the Department.
Application forms for permits must be furnished by the sheriff of
each county upon request.
2. A person applying for a permit may submit one application
and obtain one permit to carry all handguns owned by the person.
The person must not be required to list and identify on the
application each handgun owned by the person. A permit is valid for
any handgun which is owned or thereafter obtained by the person to
whom the permit is issued.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the sheriff shall
issue a permit to any person who is qualified to possess a handgun
under state and federal law, who submits an application in
accordance with the provisions of this section and who:
(a) Is:
(1) Twenty-one years of age or older; or
(2) At least 18 years of age but less than 21 years of age if
the person:
(I) Is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States,
a reserve component thereof or the National Guard; or
(II) Was discharged or released from service in the
Armed Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or
the National Guard under honorable conditions;
(b) Is not prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to NRS
202.360; and
(c) Demonstrates competence with handguns by presenting a
certificate or other documentation to the sheriff which shows that
the applicant:
(1) Successfully completed a course in firearm safety
approved by a sheriff in this State; or
(2) Successfully completed a course in firearm safety offered
by a federal, state or local law enforcement agency, community
college, university or national organization that certifies instructors
in firearm safety.
 Such a course must include instruction in the use of handguns
and in the laws of this State relating to the use of a firearm. A sheriff
may not approve a course in firearm safety pursuant to subparagraph
(1) unless the sheriff determines that the course meets any uniform
statewide standards that are established by the Nevada Sheriffs’ and
Chiefs’ Association or, if the Nevada Sheriffs’ and Chiefs’
Association ceases to exist, its legal successor.
4. The sheriff shall deny an application or revoke a permit if
the sheriff determines that the applicant or permittee:
(a) Has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest.
(b) Has been judicially declared incompetent or insane.
-
*AB436*

– 5 –
(c) Has been voluntarily or involuntarily admitted to a mental
health facility during the immediately preceding 5 years.
(d) Has habitually used intoxicating liquor or a controlled
substance to the extent that his or her normal faculties are impaired.
For the purposes of this paragraph, it is presumed that a person has
so used intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance if, during the
immediately preceding 5 years, the person has:
(1) Been convicted of violating the provisions of NRS
484C.110; or
(2) Participated in a program of treatment pursuant to NRS
176A.230 to 176A.245, inclusive.
(e) Has been convicted of a crime involving the use or
threatened use of force or violence punishable as a misdemeanor
under the laws of this or any other state, or a territory or possession
of the United States at any time during the immediately preceding 3
years.
(f) Has been convicted of a felony in this State or under the laws
of any state, territory or possession of the United States.
(g) Has been convicted of a crime involving domestic violence
or stalking, or is currently subject to a restraining order, injunction
or other order for protection against domestic violence.
(h) Is currently subject to an emergency or extended order for
protection against high-risk behavior issued pursuant to NRS 33.570
or 33.580.
(i) Is currently on parole or probation from a conviction
obtained in this State or in any other state or territory or possession
of the United States.
(j) Has, within the immediately preceding 5 years, been subject
to any requirements imposed by a court of this State or of any other
state or territory or possession of the United States, as a condition to
the court’s:
(1) Withholding of the entry of judgment for a conviction of
a felony; or
(2) Suspension of sentence for the conviction of a felony.
(k) Has made a false statement on any application for a permit
or for the renewal of a permit.
(l) Has been discharged or released from service in the Armed
Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or the
National Guard under conditions other than honorable conditions
and is less than 21 years of age.
5. The sheriff may deny an application or revoke a permit if the
sheriff receives a sworn affidavit stating articulable facts based upon
personal knowledge from any natural person who is 18 years of age
or older that the applicant or permittee has or may have committed
an offense or engaged in any other activity specified in subsection 4
-
*AB436*

– 6 –
which would preclude the issuance of a permit to the applicant or
require the revocation of a permit pursuant to this section.
6. If the sheriff receives notification submitted by a court or
law enforcement agency of this or any other state, the United States
or a territory or possession of the United States that a permittee or
an applicant for a permit has been charged with a crime involving
the use or threatened use of force or violence, the conviction for
which would require the revocation of a permit or preclude the
issuance of a permit to the applicant pursuant to this section, the
sheriff shall suspend the person’s permit or the processing of
the person’s application until the final disposition of the charges
against the person. If a permittee is acquitted of the charges, or if the
charges are dropped, the sheriff shall restore his or her permit
without imposing a fee.
7. An application submitted pursuant to this section must be
completed and signed under oath by the applicant. The applicant’s
signature must be witnessed by an employee of the sheriff or
notarized by a notary public. The application must include:
(a) The name, address, place and date of birth, social security
number, occupation and employer of the applicant and any other
names used by the applicant;
(b) A complete set of the applicant’s fingerprints taken by the
sheriff or his or her agent;
(c) A front-view colored photograph of the applicant taken by
the sheriff or his or her agent;
(d) If the applicant is a resident of this State, the driver’s license
number or identification card number of the applicant issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles;
(e) If the applicant is not a resident of this State, the driver’s
license number or identification card number of the applicant issued
by another state or jurisdiction;
(f) If the applicant is a person described in subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 3, proof that the applicant:
(1) Is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a
reserve component thereof or the National Guard, as evidenced by
his or her current military identification card; or
(2) Was discharged or released from service in the Armed
Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or the
National Guard under honorable conditions, as evidenced by his or
her DD Form 214, “Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active
Duty,” or other document of honorable separation issued by the
United States Department of Defense;
(g) A nonrefundable fee equal to the nonvolunteer rate charged
by the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History
-
*AB436*

– 7 –
and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain the reports
required pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 202.366; and
(h) A nonrefundable fee set by the sheriff not to exceed $60.
Sec. 3. NRS 202.3677 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.3677 1. If a permittee wishes to renew his or her permit,
the permittee must:
(a) Complete and submit to the sheriff who issued the permit an
application for renewal of the permit; and
(b) Undergo an investigation by the sheriff pursuant to NRS
202.366 to determine if the permittee is eligible for a permit.
2. An application for the renewal of a permit must:
(a) Be completed and signed under oath by the applicant;
(b) Contain a statement that the applicant is eligible to receive a
permit pursuant to NRS 202.3657;
(c) Be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee equal to the
nonvolunteer rate charged by the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
to obtain the reports required pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
202.366; and
(d) Be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of $25.
 If a permittee fails to renew his or her permit on or before the
date of expiration of the permit, the application for renewal must
include an additional nonrefundable late fee of $15.
3. No permit may be renewed pursuant to this section unless
the permittee has demonstrated continued competence with
handguns by successfully completing a course prescribed by the
sheriff renewing the permit. A sheriff may not prescribe such a
course unless the sheriff determines that the course meets any
uniform statewide standards, including, without limitation, the
timeframe for completing a course and the length of the course,
that are established for renewing the permit by the Nevada
Sheriffs’ and Chiefs’ Association or, if the Nevada Sheriffs’ and
Chiefs’ Association ceases to exist, its legal successor.
Sec. 4. NRS 202.3678 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.3678 1. A retired law enforcement officer who is a
resident of this State may apply, on a uniform statewide form
prescribed by regulation of the Department, to the sheriff of the
county in which he or she resides for any certification required
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 926C(d) to become a qualified retired law
enforcement officer. A retired law enforcement officer who is not a
resident of this State may apply, on a uniform statewide form
prescribed by regulation of the Department, to the sheriff of any
county for any certification required pursuant to 18 U.S.C. §
926C(d) to become a qualified retired law enforcement officer.
-
*AB436*

– 8 –
Application forms for certification must be provided by the sheriff
of each county upon request.
2. A law enforcement agency in this State shall offer a retired
law enforcement officer who retired from the law enforcement
agency the opportunity to obtain the firearms qualification that is
necessary to obtain the certification from the sheriff pursuant to
subsection 1 at least twice per year at the same facility at which the
law enforcement agency provides firearms training for its active law
enforcement officers. The law enforcement agency may impose a
nonrefundable fee in the amount necessary to pay the expenses for
providing the firearms qualification.
3. The sheriff shall provide the certification pursuant to
subsection 1 to a retired law enforcement officer who submits a
completed application and pays any fee required pursuant to this
subsection if the sheriff determines that the officer meets the
standards for training and qualifications. The sheriff may impose a
nonrefundable fee in the amount necessary to pay the expenses in
providing the certification.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239C.065.
(b) “Qualified retired law enforcement officer” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 18 U.S.C. § 926C.
Sec. 5. NRS 179A.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179A.140 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an
agency of criminal justice may charge a reasonable fee for
information relating to records of criminal history provided to any
person or governmental entity.
2. An agency of criminal justice shall not charge a fee for
providing such information to another agency of criminal justice if
the information is provided for purposes of the administration of
criminal justice.
3. The Central Repository shall not charge such a fee:
(a) For information relating to a person regarding whom the
Central Repository provided a similar report within the immediately
preceding 90 days in conjunction with the application by that person
for professional licensure;
(b) For information provided to any organization that meets the
criteria established by regulation pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 5 of NRS 179A.310; [or]
(c) For information provided to a person who is required to
conduct a background check pursuant to NRS 202.2547 [.] ; or
(d) For information provided to a licensed firearm dealer if the
dealer is required to conduct a background check pursuant to
-
*AB436*

– 9 –
federal law for a peace officer or qualified retired law enforcement
officer. As used in this paragraph:
(1) “Licensed firearm dealer” means a person licensed
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).
(2) “Qualified retired law enforcement officer” has the
meaning ascribed to it in 18 U.S.C. § 926C.
4. The Director may request an allocation from the
Contingency Account pursuant to NRS 353.266, 353.268 and
353.269 to cover the costs incurred by the Department to carry out
the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 3.
5. All money received or collected by the Department pursuant
to this section must be used to defray the cost of operating the
Central Repository or for any other purpose authorized by the
Legislature, and any balance of the money remaining at the end of a
fiscal year reverts to the State General Fund.
H
-
*AB436*